California statutes. Education Code
(d) The Controller shall make funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) available not sooner than five days after notification by the Director of Finance. The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall work with the Controller to allocate these funds to community college districts as soon as practicable.

(e) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202, for that fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision
 (e) of Section 41202, for that fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 22, Sec. 16.   (SB 81)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84752.

(a) No community college district shall receive full-time equivalent student (FTES) funding for activities that are fully funded through another source. The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall adopt regulations to implement this subdivision.

(b) The State Auditor shall report to the Legislature by January 1, 2000, on the status of community college district compliance with this section. In preparing this report, the State Auditor shall use the audit methodology used in the Bureau of State Audits Report No. 96103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 690, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

84753.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the purposes of this article, the revenue level, or full-time equivalent student (FTES) funding for the South Orange County Community College District for the 1996–97 fiscal year, and future fiscal years, shall not include any amounts that should have been allocated to the Saddleback Community College District in the 1994–95 fiscal year but that were not received by the district until the 1996–97 fiscal year, and future fiscal years, due to the bankruptcy proceedings initiated on December 6, 1994, by the County of Orange by its filing of a voluntary Chapter 9 petition in United States Bankruptcy Court, Case No. SA 94-22273-JR. These amounts shall not be included in the revenue limit, or FTES, computations for the 1996–97 fiscal year, and future fiscal years, but these amounts shall be treated as being received by the Saddleback Community College District in the 1994–95 fiscal year or the 1995–96 fiscal year, or both.

In 1997, the Saddleback Community College District changed its name to the South Orange County Community College District. For the purposes of this section, the “Saddleback Community College District” means the South Orange County Community College District, and the “South Orange County Community College District” means the Saddleback Community College District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 242, Sec. 2.   Effective August 6, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

84754.5.

Pursuant to provisions of Chapter 581 of the Statutes of 2004, the board of governors provided the Governor and the Legislature recommendations regarding the design of a workable structure for the annual evaluation of district-level performance in meeting statewide educational outcome priorities. The Legislature recognizes that these recommendations were based on a study process that included input from institutional representatives of community college districts, nationally regarded experts in community college accountability, the Department of Finance, the Office of the Legislative Analyst, community college organizations, and other interested parties. In enacting this section the Legislature hereby establishes a program for the annual reporting and evaluation of district-level performance in achieving priority educational outcomes consistent with the intent of Chapter 581 of the Statutes of 2004. The program includes the following components:

(a) As a condition of receiving specified funds in the annual Budget Act to encourage district-level accountability efforts, community college districts shall provide data, in a format and according to a schedule to be specified by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, for the purpose of the annual report to the Legislature specified in subdivision (b) and for purposes of providing the means for both internal and external assessment of the district’s educational offerings in meeting the high-priority educational goals of the state. The chancellor shall withhold, delay, or reduce funds specified in the annual Budget Act to encourage district-level accountability efforts from a district that fails to provide needed data by specified deadlines. If a district’s failure to report by specified deadlines results in the omission of required data from, or inclusion of erroneous data in, the annual report required by subdivision (b), the chancellor shall reduce that district’s funding as specified in regulations for the implementation of this section.

(b) With data available through its management information system and other data provided pursuant to subdivision (a), and utilizing resources provided for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, the chancellor shall prepare an annual report to the Legislature, the Governor, the Department of Finance, and the Office of the Legislative Analyst evaluating the achievement of educational outcomes for each community college district and, as warranted, each college. This report shall be provided to the Legislature annually on or before March 31, beginning in 2007. Preliminary data reported from the districts shall be provided to the Department of Finance and the Office of the Legislative Analyst by January 31 of each year, beginning in 2007. For each district, and college as warranted, the report shall: (1) include performance data for the immediately preceding fiscal year, reflecting all measures specified in subdivision (c); (2) compare each district’s and college’s achievement with peer groups within the system as applicable to specific metrics; and (3) compare each district’s and college’s achievements with that of the system as a whole. The report shall further include a profile with summary background information on each district’s or college’s educational programs, missions, students, and service area demographics.

(c) (1) The report shall include, but not be limited to, district or college-level performance on outcome measures in the following categories:

(A) Student progress and achievement: degrees, certificates, and transfers.

(B) Student progress and achievement: vocational, occupational, and workforce development.

(C) Pre-collegiate improvement, including basic skills and English-as-a-second language.

(2) The specific measures to be included in the report shall reflect the April 2005 board of governors recommendations as refined and amended in consultation with the Department of Finance and the Office of the Legislative Analyst, and shall be periodically reviewed, in consultation with the Department of Finance and the Office of the Legislative Analyst, and, if necessary, modified by the chancellor. It is the intent of the Legislature that specific performance metrics and annual reporting requirements may be specified in annual Budget Acts, if warranted, by changes in state needs, legislative priorities, or the availability of data.

(d) As a condition of receiving specified funds in the annual Budget Act, each community college district board of trustees shall annually review and adopt its contribution to the segmentwide annual report as part of a regularly scheduled and noticed public meeting at which public comment shall be invited.

(e) The board of governors shall adopt regulations that it deems necessary to carry out this section no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing by the chancellor to the Director of Finance and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 73, Sec. 21.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

84754.6.

(a) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in coordination with community college stakeholder groups, the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, and the Department of Finance, shall develop, and the board of governors shall adopt, a framework of indicators designed to measure the ongoing condition of a community college’s operational environment in the following areas:

(1) Accreditation status.

(2) Fiscal viability.

(3) Student performance and outcomes.

(4) Programmatic compliance with state and
 federal guidelines.

(b) As a condition of receipt of funds appropriated for purposes of Article 1 (commencing with Section 78210) of Chapter 2 of Part 48, each community college within a community college district shall develop, adopt, and publicly post a goals framework that addresses at least all of the areas specified in subdivision (a). The development of the goals framework shall be guided by the statewide goals outlined in Section 66010.91. It is the intent of the Legislature that these goals be challenging and quantifiable, address achievement gaps for underrepresented populations, and align the educational attainment of California’s adult population to the workforce and economic needs of the state, pursuant to the legislative intent expressed in Section 66010.93.

(c) The board of governors shall annually develop, adopt, and publicly post a systemwide goals framework that
 addresses at least all of the areas specified in subdivision (a). The development of the systemwide goals shall be guided by the statewide goals set forth in Section 66010.91. It is the intent of the Legislature that these goals be challenging and quantifiable, address achievement gaps for underrepresented populations, and align the educational attainment of California’s adult population to the workforce and economic needs of the state, pursuant to the legislative intent expressed in Section 66010.93.

(d) Before the commencement of the 2015–16 fiscal year, and before the commencement of each fiscal year thereafter, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall publicly post both of the following:

(1) Annually developed systemwide goals adopted by the board of governors.

(2) Locally developed and adopted
 community college or community college district goals and targets.

(e) Subject to the availability of funding in the annual Budget Act, the board of governors and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall assess the degree to which each community college district is improving its outcomes in regard to the areas specified in subdivision (a) and any additional issues addressed in the goals frameworks described in subdivision (b), and shall offer technical assistance to community college districts that are not improving.

(f) If a community college district is receiving technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (e), the community college district shall submit a turnaround plan that details all of the following:

(1) The problem the technical assistance is attempting to solve.

(2) How the identified problem will be addressed in a plan adopted by the governing board of the community college district.

(3) A timetable of major milestones for improvement.

(4) Updates that will be submitted to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges on the outcomes in regard to those milestones, as scheduled by the chancellor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 687, Sec. 8.   (SB 876)   Effective September 27, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

84755.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that program-based funding, once implemented, will more adequately and accountably fund the costs of providing quality community college education. Given that program-based funding will not be implemented until fiscal year 1991–92, given that community colleges will be entering a period of major reform and incurrence of new state mandates commencing in January 1989, and given that community colleges will be entering this period of reform having lost purchasing power since the 1977–78 fiscal year, the Legislature recognizes the need to create a transitional funding mechanism for program improvement and mandate funding that can operate until program-based funding is implemented.

(b) For the purpose of improving the quality of community college educational programs and services, for the purpose of reimbursing state-mandated local program costs imposed by this act, and for the purposes of initially implementing specified reforms, the board of governors shall, from amounts appropriated for purposes of this section, allocate program improvement revenues to each district on the basis of an amount per unit of average daily attendance funded in the prior fiscal year. However, this amount shall be increased or decreased to provide for equalization in a manner determined by the Board of Governors, consistent with Sections 84703 to 84705, inclusive.

Each community college district shall use its allocation to initially reimburse state-mandated local program costs, and then to implement specified reforms and make authorized program and service improvements as follows:

(1) Developing articulated programs provided for in Section 69 of Chapter 973 of the Statutes of 1988 with school districts and campuses of the University of California and California State University.

(2) Applying minimum qualifications to all newly hired faculty and administrators, including candidates for these positions as required by Section 87356.

(3) Developing and administering a process for waiver of minimum qualifications as required by Section 87359.

(4) Establishing and applying local hiring criteria as required by Section 87360.

(5) Establishing and applying faculty service areas and competency criteria as required by Sections 87743 to 87743.5, inclusive.

(6) Evaluating temporary employees, instituting peer review evaluation, and widely distributing evaluation procedures as required by Section 87663.

(7) Establishing and applying new processes for tenure evaluation required by Section 87610.1.

(8) Establishing and applying the tenure denial grievance procedure required by Section 87610.1.

(9) Establishing and applying a process for moving administrators into faculty positions as required by Sections 87454 to 87458, inclusive.

(10) Publishing and distributing a report on the affirmative action success rate as required by Section 87102.

(11) Improving instruction by reducing the ratio of full-time equivalent students to full-time equivalent instructors.

(12) Improving instruction by increasing the hiring of full-time instructors and limiting the practice of hiring part-time instructors.

(13) Augmenting budgets for college libraries and learning resources.

(14) Augmenting budgets for plant maintenance and operations.

(15) Adding new courses or programs to serve community need.

(16) Making progress towards affirmative action goals and timetables established by the district.

(17) Developing and maintaining programs and services authorized by Section 78212.5.

(18) Augmenting budgets for student services in the areas of greatest need.

(19) Providing for release time for faculty and staff as deemed appropriate by the governing board of each community college district, to enable faculty and staff participation in implementing reforms.

(20) Developing and administering a program that provides for reassignment of up to 20 percent of the time of individual tenured faculty member’s teaching assignments, as determined by the governing board of each community college district, to counsel and assist newly hired faculty acquire teaching and classroom management skills. A governing board shall approve reassignment time for no more than 5 percent of the district’s full-time equivalent tenured faculty in any one fiscal year.

(c) Except as provided by Section 87482.6, and except as necessary to reimburse the costs of new state mandates, district governing boards shall have full authority to expend program improvement allocations for any or all of the authorized purposes specified in subdivision (b).

(d) As required by the board of governors, the governing board of each community college district shall submit to the board of governors a plan for using the resources allocated pursuant to this section. The board of governors shall review each plan to ensure that proposed expenditures are consistent with the listing of authorized expenditures provided in this section, and the board of governors shall approve all plans to the full extent that expenditures are authorized by this section. To the extent that a community college district expends its program improvement allocation consistent with its plan, the board of governors shall include the district’s allocation as part of the district’s base budget for subsequent years.

(e) The board of governors, through the annual systemwide budget submitted pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 70901, shall request necessary resources for the purposes of this section. It is the intent of the Legislature that the appropriation and allocation of program improvement money not otherwise provided pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be accomplished through the annual state budget process beginning with the 1989–90 fiscal year. After June 30, 1991, if Section 84750 is implemented, it is the intent of the Legislature to fund the ongoing operations of community college districts pursuant to Section 84750.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 449, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

84756.

It is the intent of the Legislature that community college districts with noncredit programs recognize the importance of noncredit programs and that they will continue to support these offerings.

It is also the intent of the Legislature that community college districts with noncredit programs consider the need for both credit and noncredit allocations in allocating future growth pursuant to board of governors regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 125.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

84757.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, the following noncredit courses, noncredit classes, and support services shall be eligible for funding:

(1) Parenting, including parent cooperative preschools, classes in child growth and development and parent-child relationships.

(2) Elementary and secondary
 foundational skills and other courses and classes such as pretransfer-level academic courses or classes in reading, mathematics, and language arts.

(3) English as a second language.

(4) Classes and courses for immigrants eligible for educational services in citizenship, English as a second language, and workforce preparation classes in the
 foundational skills of speaking, listening, reading, writing, mathematics, decisionmaking and problem solving skills, and other classes required for preparation to participate in job-specific technical training.

(5) Education programs for persons with substantial disabilities.

(6) Short-term vocational programs with high employment potential.

(7) Education programs for older adults.

(8) Education programs for home economics.

(9) Health and safety education.

(10) Supervised tutoring for foundational
 skills and for degree-applicable and transfer-level courses, as authorized pursuant to regulations adopted by the board of governors on or before July 31, 2023. These regulations shall ensure that community colleges are compliant with Section 78213 in the implementation of supervised tutoring pursuant to this paragraph.

(b) No state apportionment shall be made for any class or course that is not set forth in subdivision (a) and for which no credit is given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 927, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 1187)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

84757.5.

(a) The chancellor’s office, in conjunction with the department, shall annually report on the number and types of courses being taught and the number of students being served with funding provided to the regional consortia established pursuant to Section 84830. The chancellor’s office shall annually report on the number and types of noncredit courses being taught and the number of students being served with funding provided to the community colleges for the courses offered pursuant to Section 84757.

(b) The chancellor’s office shall identify any deficits in course offerings based upon levels, types, and needs for adult education programs identified in the
 consortia plans submitted as required under subdivision (c) of Section 84830.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 545, Sec. 3.   (SB 173)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84758.

Not later than May 15 of each year, the Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature and the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges of the amount of revenue estimated to be available to community college districts during the next fiscal year from local property taxes, exclusive of bond interest and redemption, and timber taxes received. Not later than March 15 of each year, the chancellor’s office shall certify to the Department of Finance the amount of revenue available from these tax sources for the current fiscal year. The Department of Finance shall subtract the total amount of available revenue certified by the chancellor’s office from the total amount of available revenue estimated by the department the preceding May. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature of the resulting difference and shall advise the Legislature as to whether the difference represents a net surplus or a net deficit in the funds appropriated to meet the requirements of Section 84750.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 127.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

84759.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms mean:

(1) “CalWORKs recipient” means a recipient of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or any successor program.

(2) “Direct excess costs” means the fixed, variable, and one-time costs associated with providing noncredit instructional services to CalWORKs recipients, as determined by the chancellor’s office.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a community college district, to the extent funding is made available in the annual Budget Act, shall receive funding for noncredit instruction developed for and targeted to CalWORKs recipients, including funding to offset the direct excess cost of providing noncredit instruction to CalWORKs recipients when the cost of providing a specific course offering exceeds the average cost of noncredit instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 18.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

84760.5.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, the following career development and college preparation courses and classes for which credit is not given, and courses that are offered in both face-to-face and distance education instructional methods, leading to a certificate of completion, that lead to improved employability or job placement opportunities, or to a certificate of competency in a recognized career field by articulating with college-level
 coursework, completion of an associate of arts degree, or for transfer to a four-year degree program, are eligible for funding subject to subdivision (b):

(1) Classes and courses in elementary and secondary basic skills.

(2) Classes and courses for students, eligible for educational services in workforce preparation classes, in the basic skills of speaking, listening, reading, writing, mathematics, decisionmaking, and problem solving skills that are necessary to participate in job-specific technical training.

(3) Short-term vocational programs with high employment potential, as determined by the chancellor in consultation with the Employment Development Department using job demand data provided by that department.

(4) Classes and courses in English as a second language and vocational English as a second language.

(b) The board of governors shall adopt criteria and standards for the identification of career development and college preparation courses and the eligibility of these courses for funding, including the definition of courses eligible for funding pursuant to subdivision (a). The criteria and standards shall be based on recommendations from the chancellor, the statewide academic senate, and the statewide association of chief instructional officers. The career and college preparation courses to be identified for this higher rate of funding should include suitable courses that meet one or more of the qualifications described in subdivision (a).

(c) A district that offers courses described in subdivision (a), but that is not eligible for funding under subdivision (b), shall be eligible for funding under Section 84757.

(d) The chancellor, in consultation with the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst’s Office, shall develop specific outcome measures for career development and college preparation courses for incorporation into the annual report required by subdivision (b) of Section 84754.5.

(e) The chancellor shall prepare and submit to the Department of Finance and the Legislature, on or before November 1 of each year, a report that details, at a minimum, the following:

(1) The amount of FTES claimed by each community college district for
 career development and college preparation courses and classes.

(2) The specific certificate programs and course titles of career development and college preparation courses and classes receiving additional funding pursuant to this section, and the number of those courses and classes receiving additional funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.   (AB 634)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

84810.5.

(a) (1) Open course provisions in statute or regulations of the board of governors shall be waived for any governing board of a community college district for classes the district provides to inmates of any city, county, or city and county jail, road camp, farm for adults, or state or federal correctional facility. This section does not authorize the waiver of open course provisions in any context or situation other than those that are specifically authorized by this section. Subject to limitations set forth in subdivision (b), the board of governors may include the units of full-time equivalent students (FTES) generated in those classes for purposes of state apportionments.

(2) The attendance hours generated by credit courses shall be funded
 at the marginal credit rate determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 84750.4 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5, as applicable. The attendance hours generated by noncredit courses shall be funded at the noncredit rate pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 84750.4 or paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5, as applicable. The attendance hours generated by instruction in career development and college preparation shall be funded at the rate determined pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 84750.4 or paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5, as applicable.

(b) (1) A community college district shall not claim, for purposes of state apportionments under this section, any class to which either of the following applies:

(A) The district receives full compensation
 for its direct education costs for the conduct of the class from any public or private agency, individual, or group of individuals.

(B) The district has a contract or instructional agreement, or both, for the conduct of the class with a public or private agency, individual, or group of individuals that has received from another source full compensation for the costs the district incurs under that contract or instructional agreement.

(2) In reporting a claim for apportionment to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges under this section, the district shall report any partial compensation it receives from the sources described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) during the period for which the claim is made. The chancellor shall subtract the amount of any partial compensation received from the total apportionment to be paid.

(c) This section does not provide a source of funds to shift, supplant, or reduce the costs incurred by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation in providing inmate education programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 38.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

84810.7.

(a) On or before March 1, 2015, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall enter into an interagency agreement to expand access to community college courses that lead to degrees or certificates that result in enhanced workforce skills or transfer to a four-year university. The courses for inmates in a state correctional facility developed as a result of this agreement will serve to supplement, but not duplicate or supplant, any adult education course opportunities offered at that facility by the Office of Correctional Education of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(b) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, in collaboration with the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, shall develop metrics for evaluations of the efficacy and success of the programs developed through the interagency agreement established pursuant to this section, conduct the evaluations, and report findings from the evaluations to the Legislature and the Governor on or before July 31, 2018.

(c) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (b) is inoperative on July 31, 2022, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 695, Sec. 2.   (SB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84811.

(a) (1) Open course provisions in statute or regulations of the board of governors shall be waived for any governing board of a community college district for community college courses the district provides to military personnel, their dependents, and authorized civilian employees on a military base. This section does not authorize the waiver of open course provisions in any context or situation other than those that are specifically authorized by this section. Subject to limitations set forth in subdivision (b), the board of governors
 may include the units of full-time equivalent students (FTES) generated in those community college courses for purposes of state apportionments.

(2) The attendance hours generated by credit courses shall be funded at the marginal credit rate determined pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 84750.4. The attendance hours generated by noncredit courses shall be funded at the noncredit rate pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5. The attendance hours generated by instruction in career development and college preparation shall be funded at the rate determined pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5.

(b) (1) A community college district shall not claim, for purposes of state apportionments under this section, any class to which either of the following applies:

(A) The district receives full compensation for its direct education costs for the conduct of the class from any public or private agency, individual, or group of individuals.

(B) The district has a contract or instructional agreement, or both, for the conduct of the class with a public or private agency, individual, or group of individuals that has received from another source full compensation for the costs the district incurs under that contract or instructional agreement.

(2) In reporting a claim for apportionment to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges under this section, the district shall report any partial compensation it receives from the sources described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) during the period for which the claim is made. The chancellor shall subtract the amount of any partial compensation received from the total apportionment to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (AB 576)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Adjustments to Lottery Fund Allocations [84820. - 84820.]

84820.

Any lottery revenue allocated to a public education entity pursuant to Section 8880.5 of the Government Code shall not be reduced by more than one-half of 1 percent per year when that reduction is the direct result of any entity changing its method of computing workload units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 129.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Adult Education Consortium Program [84830. - 84830.]

84830.

(a) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the State Department of Education shall, pursuant to funding made available in the annual Budget Act, jointly provide two-year planning and implementation grants to regional consortia of community college districts and school districts for the purpose of developing regional plans to better serve the educational needs of adults.

(1) Eligibility shall be limited to consortia consisting of at least one community college district and at least one school district within the boundaries of the community college district, either of which may serve as the consortium’s fiscal agent, as determined by the applicant consortium.

(2) If a community college district chooses not to participate in a consortium, a neighboring community college district may form a consortium with school districts within the boundaries of the nonparticipating community college district.

(3) Consortia may include other entities providing adult education courses, including, but not necessarily limited to, correctional facilities, other local public entities, and community-based organizations.

(b) Grant funds provided pursuant to this section shall be used by each regional consortium to create and implement a plan to better provide adults in its region with all of the following:

(1) Elementary and secondary basic skills, including classes required for a high school diploma or high school equivalency
 certificate.

(2) Classes and courses for immigrants eligible for educational services in citizenship and English as a second language, and workforce preparation classes in basic skills.

(3) Education programs for adults with disabilities.

(4) Short-term career technical education programs with high employment potential.

(5) Programs offering pre-apprenticeship training activities conducted in coordination with one or more apprenticeship programs approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards for the occupation and geographic area.

(c) (1) The classes and courses described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) shall distribute basic information on American
 government and civics that includes, but is not limited to, instruction on all of the following:

(A) Federal, state, and local government.

(B) The three branches of government.

(C) The importance of civic engagement.

(D) Registering to vote.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that, consistent with the requirements of Sections 51225.3 and 52555, students enrolled in classes and courses described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) in which instruction in American government and civics is appropriate shall receive instruction in American government and civics.

(d) Each regional consortium’s plan shall include, at
 a minimum:

(1) An evaluation of current levels and types of adult education programs within its region, including education for adults in correctional facilities; credit, noncredit, and enhanced noncredit adult education coursework; and programs funded through Title II of the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998, known as the Adult Education and Family Literacy Act (Public Law 105-220).

(2) An evaluation of current needs for adult education programs within its region.

(3) Plans for parties that make up the consortium to integrate their existing programs and create seamless transitions into postsecondary education or the workforce.

(4) Plans to address the gaps identified pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2).

(5) Plans to employ approaches proven to accelerate a student’s progress toward his or her academic or career goals, such as contextualized basic skills and career technical education, and other joint programming strategies between adult education and career technical education.

(6) Plans to collaborate in the provision of ongoing professional development opportunities for faculty and other staff to help them achieve greater program integration and improve student outcomes.

(7) Plans to leverage existing regional structures, including, but not necessarily limited to, local workforce investment areas.

(e) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the State Department of Education may identify additional elements that consortia must include in a
 plan.

(f) (1) On or before March 1, 2014, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the State Department of Education shall submit a joint report to the Legislature and the Governor. This report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, both of the following:

(A) The status of developing regional consortia across the state, including identification of unserved geographic areas or emerging gaps in regional program delivery.

(B) The status and allocation of grant awards made to regional consortia.

(2) The report shall be submitted to the Legislature as provided in Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(g) (1) On or before March
 1, 2015, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the State Department of Education shall submit a joint report to the Legislature and the Governor. This report shall include, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(A) The plans developed by regional consortia across the state.

(B) Recommendations for additional improvements in the delivery system serving adult learners.

(2) The report shall be submitted to the Legislature as provided in Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature to work toward developing common policies related to adult education affecting adult schools at local educational agencies and community colleges, including policies on fees and funding levels.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide additional funding in the 2015–16 fiscal year to regional consortia to expand and improve the provision of adult education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 38.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Handicapped Students [84850. - 84850.]

84850.
